District of Columbia statutes.
7-219

Confidentiality.

(a)

No person may permit inspection of, disclose information contained in, or copy or issue a copy of any part of a vital record except as authorized by this chapter, regulations issued under and consistent with this chapter, or by order of the Court. Regulations issued under this section shall provide for adequate standards of security and confidentiality of vital records.

(b)

The Registrar may authorize the disclosure of information contained in vital records for research purposes, and shall issue regulations governing such use of the records.

(c)

Except for certificates, reports, or other documents which are sealed or confidential by statute, 100 years after the date of birth, and 50 years after the date of death, marriage, divorce or annulment, records in the custody of the Registrar become public records. The Registrar shall issue regulations to provide for continued safekeeping of these records and to allow information in these records to be made available to the public.

(d)

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Registrar shall provide reports of deaths of children 18 years of age or younger who either received or were eligible to receive certificates of live birth, as defined by § 7-201(9), to the Child Fatality Review Committee pursuant to § 4-1317.12.

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 20, 28 DCR 3271
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4615, 48 DCR 6981
This section is referenced in § 4-1371.06, § 7-220, and § 16-1054.
1981 Ed., § 6-219.
D.C. Law 14-28 added subsec. (d).

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 15 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-20, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9090).

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 15 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-40, April 25, 2001, 48 DCR 5917).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 15 of Child Fatality Review Committee Establishment Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-82, July 9, 2001, 48 DCR 6355).